Utah statutes.
63C-12-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Council" means the Snake Valley Aquifer Advisory Council created in
Section 63C-12-103.
(2)  "Research team" means the Snake Valley Research Team created in Section
63C-12-107.
